Illinois, session 104th, HB1725.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Local business advertising.8    (a) For taxable years that begin on or after January 1, 92026 and begin before January 1, 2031, each taxpayer that is a 10qualified small business may apply to the Department for a 11credit against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 12Section 201 in an amount equal to the amount paid by the 13taxpayer during the taxable year for qualified advertising 14with a local news organization. The credit may not exceed 15$2,500 per eligible taxpayer in any taxable year. The 16aggregate amount of all tax credits awarded by the Department 17under this Section in any calendar year may not exceed 18$3,000,000. Credits shall be awarded on a first-come 19first-served basis until the maximum credit amount is reached. 20Upon approval of a tax credit award under this Section, the 21Department shall issue a tax credit certificate to the 22taxpayer, and the taxpayer shall attach that certificate to 23the taxpayer's Illinois income tax return.   HB1725- 2 -LRB104 06550 HLH 16586 b1    (b) The credit shall be available only in the taxable year 2in which the investment is made and shall not be allowed to the 3extent that it would reduce a taxpayer's liability for the tax 4imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 to less than 5zero. 6    (c) If the taxpayer is a partnership or a Subchapter S 7corporation, then the provisions of Section 251 apply. 8    (c) As used in this Section: 9    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 10Opportunity. 11    "Local news organization" has the meaning given to that 12term in the Strengthening Community Media Act. 13    "Qualified advertising" means any advertising with a local 14news organization for the purpose of promoting the qualified 15small business, including advertising that appears in a 16newspaper, on television, on a billboard, or through other 17digital or print media. 18    "Qualified small business" means an independently owned 19and operated for-profit entity that (i) has 50 or fewer 20full-time employees or grosses less than $4,000,000 per year 21and (ii) is located within a 25 mile radius of a business 22location of the local news organization.  23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.